Massachusetts, session 194th, H2382.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 51N of chapter 111, as inserted by chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby
amended by striking out the definition of “Office-based surgical center,”, and inserting in place
thereof the following definition:-
“Office-based surgical center”, an office, group of offices, a facility or any portion
thereof owned, leased or operated by 1 or more practitioners engaged in a solo or group practice,
however organized, whether conducted for profit or not for profit, which is advertised,
announced, established or maintained for the purpose of providing office-based surgical services;
provided, however, that “office-based surgical center” shall not include: (i) a hospital licensed
under section 51 or by the federal government; (ii) an ambulatory surgical center as defined
pursuant to section 25B and licensed under said section 51; or (iii) a surgical center performing
services in accordance with section 12M of chapter 112. The term “office-based surgical center”
shall not apply to the practice of dentistry or oral and maxillofacial surgery by an individual
of 2

licensed by the board of registration in dentistry in accordance with the provisions of chapter
112.”
of 2